Maine, session 132, LD2190.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §328, sub-§23-A is enacted to read:
23-A. Private equity company. "Private equity company" means an entity whether
or not publicly traded that collects capital investments from individuals or entities.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §328, sub-§24-A is enacted to read:
24-A. Real estate investment trust. "Real estate investment trust" has the same
meaning as in the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, Section 856.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §331, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. There is a change in the ownership structure or operational control of a health
care facility involving a private equity company or real estate investment trust;
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §335, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 2023, c. 343, §3, is further
amended to read:
F. In the case of a nursing facility project that proposes to add new nursing facility
beds to the inventory of nursing facility beds within the State, is consistent with the
nursing facility MaineCare funding pool and other applicable provisions of sections
333‑A and 334‑A; and
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §335, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 343, §4, is amended
by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) After considering all reasonable alternatives, that access to other health care
services will be substantially reduced if the project is not approved.; and
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §335, sub-§1, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Does not negatively affect the affordability and accessibility of health care services
for all residents of the State.
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §335, sub-§5-A, ¶H, as amended by PL 2023, c. 343, §5, is
further amended to read:
H. Except with regard to a project related to nursing facility services, a written
assessment by the Director of the Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention of
the impact of the project on the health of persons living in the State, including without
limitation an assessment of the impact of the project on access to, geographic proximity
of, timeliness of and quality of any family planning services, as defined in section 1902,
subsection 4, and any abortion services; and
Sec. 8. 22 MRSA §335, sub-§5-A, ¶I, as amended by PL 2013, c. 424, Pt. B, §9,
is further amended to read:
I. Except with regard to a project related to nursing facility services, or a project that
qualifies for a simplified review process under section 336, a written assessment by the
Superintendent of Insurance of the impact of the project on the cost of insurance in the
region and the State when required by the commissioner. The superintendent may
request additional information from the applicant for the purpose of reviewing the
application. Any such request must be transmitted through the department and
becomes part of the official record. The applicant shall respond to the request within
Page 1 - 132LR3019(01)

411 30 days. Any such response must be transmitted through the department and becomes
422 part of the official record. The inability of the superintendent to complete the review
433 of the application due to the failure of the applicant to respond timely must be noted in
444 the superintendent's assessment filed with the department and may be cause for the
455 commissioner to deny approval of the project.; and
Sec. 9. 22 MRSA §335, sub-§5-A, ¶J is enacted to read:
J. With regard to a project that involves a transfer of ownership or acquisition of
control of a health care facility pursuant to section 329, subsection 1, an analysis by
the staff of the department of the extent to which the applicant's ownership structure
involves a private equity company or real estate investment trust and the impact of that
ownership structure on the ability of the applicant to meet the conditions set forth in
subsection 1 and subsection 7. The department shall contract with a consultant funded
by the applicant to review and investigate the prior activities and conduct of any private
equity company or real estate investment trust associated with the project and may also
consult with the Attorney General to complete the analysis required by this paragraph.